North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 7A. Registration of Voters.
§ 163-82.10.
Official record of voter registration.

Official Record. — The State voter registration system is the official voter registration list for the conduct of all elections in the State. The State Board and the county board of elections may keep copies of voter registration data, including voter
registration applications, in any medium and format expressly approved by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources pursuant to standards and conditions established by the Department and mutually agreed to by the Department
and the State Board. A completed and signed registration application form, if available, described in

G.S. 163-82.3

, once approved by the county board of elections, becomes backup to the official registration record of the voter. (a1) Personal Identifying Information. — Full or partial social security numbers, dates of birth,
the identity of the public agency at which the voter registered under

G.S. 163-82.20

, any electronic mail address submitted under this Article, Article 20, or Article 21A of this Chapter, photocopies of identification for voting, and drivers license numbers, whether held by the State Board or a
county board of elections, are confidential and shall not be considered public records and subject to disclosure to the general public under Chapter 132 of the General Statutes. Cumulative data based on those items of information
may be publicly disclosed as long as information about any individual cannot be discerned from the disclosed data. Disclosure of information in violation of this subsection shall not give rise to a civil cause of action. This limitation
of liability does not apply to the disclosure of information in violation of this subsection as a result of gross negligence, wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing that would otherwise be actionable.

(a2) Voter Signatures. — The signature of the voter, either on the paper application or an electronically captured image of it, whether held by the State Board or a county board of elections, may be viewed by the public but may not be copied or traced
except by election officials for election administration purposes. Any such copy or tracing is not a public record.

Paperless, Instant Electronic Transfer. — The application described in

G.S. 163-82.3

may be either a paper hard copy or an electronic document.

Access to Registration Records. — Upon request by that person, the county board of elections shall provide to any person a list of the registered voters of the county or of any precinct or precincts in the county. The county board may furnish selective
lists according to party affiliation, gender, race, date of registration, precinct name, precinct identification code, congressional district, senate district, representative district, and, where applicable, county commissioner
district, city governing board district, fire district, soil and water conservation district, and voter history including primary, general, and special districts, or any other reasonable category. No list produced under this section
shall contain a voter’s date of birth. However, lists may be produced according to voters’ ages. Both the following shall apply to all counties:

The county board of elections shall make the voter registration information available to the public on electronic or magnetic medium. For purposes of this section, “electronic or magnetic medium” means any of the media in use by the State Board of Elections
at the time of the request.

Information requested on electronic or magnetic medium shall contain the following: voter name, county voter identification number, residential address, mailing address, sex, race, age but not date of birth, party affiliation, precinct name, precinct
identification code, congressional district, senate district, representative district, and, where applicable, county commissioner district, city governing board district, fire district, soil and water conservation district,
and any other district information available, and voter history including primary, general, and special districts, or any other reasonable category.

The county board shall require each person to whom a list is furnished to reimburse the board for the actual cost incurred in preparing it, except as provided in subsection (d) of this section. Actual cost for the purpose of this section shall not include
the cost of any equipment or any imputed overhead expenses. When furnishing information under this subsection to a purchaser on a magnetic medium provided by the county board or the purchaser, the county board may impose
a service charge of up to twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

Free Lists. — A county board shall provide, upon written request, one free list of all the registered voters in the county to the State chair of each political party and to the county chair of each political party once in every odd-numbered year, once
during the first six calendar months of every even-numbered year, and once during the latter six calendar months of every even-numbered year. Each free list shall include the name, address, gender, age but not date of birth, race,
political affiliation, voting history, precinct, precinct name, precinct identification code, congressional district, senate district, representative district, and, where applicable, county commissioner district, city governing
board district, fire district, soil and water conservation district, and voter history including primary, general, and special districts of each registered voter. All free lists shall be provided as soon as practicable on one of
any electronic or magnetic media, but no later than 30 days after written request. Each State party chair shall provide the information on the media received from the county boards or a copy of the media containing the data itself
to candidates of that party who request the data in writing. As used in this section, “political party” means a political party as defined in

G.S. 163-96

.

Exception for Address of Certain Registered Voters. — Notwithstanding subsections (c) and (d) of this section, if a registered voter submits to the county board of elections a copy of a protective order without attachments, if any, issued to that person
under

G.S. 50B-3

or a lawful order of any court of competent jurisdiction restricting the access or contact of one or more persons with a registered voter or a current and valid Address Confidentiality Program authorization card
issued pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 15C of the General Statutes, accompanied by a signed statement that the voter has good reason to believe that the physical safety of the voter or a member of the voter’s family residing
with the voter would be jeopardized if the voter’s address were open to public inspection, that voter’s address is a public record but shall be kept confidential as long as the protective order remains in effect or the voter remains
a certified program participant in the Address Confidentiality Program. That voter’s name, precinct, and the other data contained in that voter’s registration record shall remain a public record. That voter’s signed statement submitted
under this subsection is a public record but shall be kept confidential as long as the protective order remains in effect or the voter remains a certified program participant in the Address Confidentiality Program. It is the responsibility
of the voter to provide the county board with a copy of the valid protective order in effect or a current and valid Address Confidentiality Program authorization card issued pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 15C of the General
Statutes. The voter’s actual address shall be used for any election-related purpose by any board of elections. That voter’s address shall be available for inspection by a law enforcement agency or by a person identified in a court
order, if inspection of the address by that person is directed by that court order. It shall not be a violation of this section if the address of a voter who is participating in the Address Confidentiality Program is discovered
by a member of the public in public records disclosed by a county board of elections prior to December 1, 2001. Addresses required to be kept confidential by this section shall not be made available to the jury commission under
the provisions of

G.S. 9-2

.

History.
1901, c. 89, s. 83; Rev., s. 4382; C.S., s. 6016; 1931, c. 80; 1939, c. 263, s. 31/2; 1949, c. 916, ss. 6, 7; 1953, c. 843; 1955, c. 800; 1959, c. 883; 1963, c. 303, s. 1; 1965, c. 1116, s. 1; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c.
793, ss. 22, 25; 1975, c. 12; c. 395; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1242; 1981, c. 39, s. 1; c. 87, s.1; c. 308, s. 1; c. 656; 1983, c. 218, ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 211, ss. 1, 2; c. 472, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess.,
1996), c. 688, s. 2; 2001-396, s. 1; 2002-171, s. 8; 2003-226, ss. 2, 3; 2003-278, s. 6; 2004-127, s. 17(c); 2005-428, s. 10(a), (b); 2007-391, s. 19; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2009-541, s. 12; 2011-182, s. 9; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s); 2017-6,
s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2019-239, s. 1.1(c).

Cross References.

As to the use and confidential nature of actual addresses of Address Confidentiality Program participants by boards of elections for election-related purposes, see

G.S. 15C-8

.

§ 163-82.10A.
Permanent voter registration numbers.

The statewide voter registration system shall assign to each voter a unique registration number. That number shall be permanent for that voter and shall not be changed or reassigned by the county board of elections.

History.
2001-319, s. 8.1(a); 2003-226, s. 10; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.10B.
Confidentiality of date of birth.

Boards of elections shall keep confidential the date of birth of every voter-registration applicant and registered voter, except in the following situations:

When a voter has filed notice of candidacy for elective office under

G.S. 163-106

, 163-122, 163-123, or 163-294.2, has been nominated as a candidate under

G.S. 163-98

or

G.S. 163-114

, or has otherwise formally become a candidate for elective office. The exception of this subdivision does not extend to an individual who meets the definition of “candidate” only by beginning a tentative candidacy
by receiving funds or making payments or giving consent to someone else to receive funds or transfer something of value for the purpose of exploring a candidacy.

When a voter is serving in an elective office.

When a voter has been challenged pursuant to Article 8 of this Chapter.

When a voter-registration applicant or registered voter expressly authorizes in writing the disclosure of that individual’s date of birth.

When requested by a county jury commission established pursuant to

G.S. 9-1

for purposes of preparing the master jury list in that county pursuant to

G.S. 9-2

. The disclosure of an individual’s age does not constitute disclosure of date of birth in violation of this section.

The county board of elections shall give precinct officials access to a voter’s date of birth where necessary for election administration, consistent with the duty to keep dates of birth confidential.

Disclosure of a date of birth in violation of this section shall not give rise to a civil cause of action. This limitation of liability does not apply to the disclosure of a date of birth in violation of this subsection as a result of gross negligence,
wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing that would otherwise be actionable.

History.
2004-127, s. 17(a); 2013-166, s. 1; 2017-3, s. 4; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.11.
Establishment of statewide computerized voter registration.

Statewide System as Official List. — The State Board of Elections shall develop and implement a statewide computerized voter registration system to facilitate voter registration and to provide a central database containing voter registration information
for each county. The system shall serve as the single system for storing and managing the official list of registered voters in the State. The system shall serve as the official voter registration list for the conduct of all elections
in the State. The system shall encompass both software development and purchasing of the necessary hardware for the central and distributed-network systems.

Uses of Statewide System. — The State Board of Elections shall develop and implement the system so that each county board of elections can do all the following:

Verify that an applicant to register in its county is not also registered in another county.

Be notified automatically that a registered voter in its county has registered to vote in another county.

Receive automatically data about a person who has applied to vote at a drivers license office or at another public agency that is authorized to accept voter registration applications.

Compliance With Federal Law. — The State Board of Elections shall update the statewide computerized voter registration list and database to meet the requirements of section 303(a) of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 and to reflect changes when citizenship
rights are restored under

G.S. 13-1

.

Role of County and State Boards of Elections. — Each county board of elections shall be responsible for registering voters within its county according to law. Each county board of elections shall maintain its records by using the statewide computerized
voter registration system in accordance with rules promulgated by the State Board of Elections. Each county board of elections shall enter through the computer system all additions, deletions, and changes in its list of registered
voters promptly to the statewide computer system.

Cooperation on List for Jury Commission. — The State Board of Elections shall assist the Division of Motor Vehicles in providing to the county jury commission of each county, as required by

G.S. 20-43.4

, a list of all registered voters in the county and all persons in the county with drivers license records. The list of registered voters provided by the State Board of Elections shall not include any registered
voter who has been inactive for eight years or more.

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2003-226, s. 6; 2007-512, s. 4; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.12.
Promulgation of guidelines relating to computerized voter registration.

The State Board of Elections shall make all guidelines necessary to administer the statewide voter registration system established by this Article. All county boards of elections shall follow these guidelines and cooperate with the State Board of Elections
in implementing guidelines. These guidelines shall include provisions for all of the following:

Establishing, developing, and maintaining a computerized central voter registration file.

Linking the central file through a network with computerized voter registration files in each of the counties.

Interacting with the computerized drivers license records of the Division of Motor Vehicles and with the computerized records of other public agencies authorized to accept voter registration applications.

Protecting and securing the data.

Converting current voter registration records in the counties in computer files that can be used on the statewide computerized registration system.

Enabling the statewide system to determine whether the voter identification information provided by an individual is valid.

Enabling the statewide system to interact electronically with the Division of Motor Vehicles system to validate identification information.

Enabling the Division of Motor Vehicles to provide real-time interface for the validation of the drivers license number and last four digits of the social security number.

Notifying voter-registration applicants whose drivers license or last four digits of social security number does not result in a validation, attempting to resolve the discrepancy, initiating investigations under G.S. 163-33(3) or challenges under Article
8 of this Chapter where warranted, and notifying any voters of the requirement under G.S. 163-166.12(b2) to present identification when voting.

Enabling the statewide system to assign a unique identifier to each legally registered voter in the State.

Enabling the State Board of Elections to assist the Division of Motor Vehicles in providing to the jury commission of each county, as required by

G.S. 20-43.4

, a list of all registered voters in the county and all persons in the county with drivers license records.

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2003-226, s. 7(a); 2007-391, s. 21(b); 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2013-410, s. 14(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 4.5(c).

§ 163-82.13.
Access to statewide voter registration file.

Free Copy for Political Parties. — Beginning January 1, 1996, the State Board of Elections shall make available free of charge, upon written request, one magnetic copy of the statewide computerized voter registration file to the chairman of each political
party as defined in

G.S. 163-96

as soon as practicable after the close of registration before every statewide primary and election. The file made available to the political party chairmen shall contain the name, address, gender, age but not date
of birth, race, voting history, political affiliation, and precinct of every registered voter in the State. If a county board enters telephone numbers into its computer lists of registered voters, then the free list provided under
this subsection shall include telephone numbers.

Copies for Sale to Others. — Beginning January 1, 1996, the State Board of Elections shall sell, upon written request, to other public and private organizations and persons magnetic copies of the statewide computerized voter registration file. The State
Board of Elections may sell selective lists of registered voters according to county, congressional or legislative district, party affiliation, gender, age but not date of birth, race, date of registration, or any other reasonable
category, or a combination of categories. The State Board of Elections shall require all persons to whom any list is furnished under this subsection to reimburse the board for the actual cost incurred in preparing it.

History.
1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2004-127, s. 17(d); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.14.
List maintenance.

Uniform Program. — The State Board of Elections shall adopt a uniform program that makes a diligent effort not less than twice each year:

To remove the names of ineligible voters from the official lists of eligible voters, and

To update the addresses and other necessary data of persons who remain on the official lists of eligible voters. That program shall be nondiscriminatory and shall comply with the provisions of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, and with the provisions
of the National Voter Registration Act. The State Board of Elections, in addition to the methods set forth in this section, may use other methods toward the ends set forth in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection,
including address-updating services provided by the Postal Service, and entering into data sharing agreements with other states to cross-check information on voter registration and voting records. Any data sharing agreement
shall require the other state or states to comply with

G.S. 163-82.10

and

G.S. 163-82.10

B. Each county board of elections shall conduct systematic efforts to remove names from its list of registered voters in accordance with this section and with the program adopted by the State Board. The
county boards of elections shall complete their list maintenance mailing program by April 15 of every odd-numbered year, unless the State Board of Elections approves a different date for the county.

Death. — The Department of Health and Human Services shall furnish free of charge to the State Board of Elections every month, in a format prescribed by the State Board of Elections, the names of deceased persons who were residents of the State. The
State Board of Elections shall distribute every month to each county board of elections the names on that list of deceased persons who were residents of that county. The Department of Health and Human Services shall base each list
upon information supplied by death certifications it received during the preceding month. Upon the receipt of those names, each county board of elections shall remove from its voter registration records any person the list shows
to be dead. Each county board of elections shall also remove from its voter registration records a person identified as deceased by a signed statement of a near relative or personal representative of the estate of the deceased
voter. The county board need not send any notice to the address of the person so removed.

Conviction of a Felony. —

Report of Conviction Within the State. — The State Board of Elections, on or before the fifteenth day of every month, shall report to the county board of elections of that county the name, county of residence, and residence address if available, of each
individual against whom a final judgment of conviction of a felony has been entered in that county in the preceding calendar month.

Report of Federal Conviction. — The Executive Director of the State Board of Elections, upon receipt of a notice of conviction sent by a United States Attorney pursuant to section 8(g) of the National Voter Registration Act, shall notify the appropriate
county boards of elections of the conviction.

County Board’s Duty Upon Receiving Report of Conviction. — When a county board of elections receives a notice pursuant to subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection relating to a resident of that county and that person is registered to vote in that county,
the board shall, after giving 30 days’ written notice to the voter at his registration address, and if the voter makes no objection, remove the person’s name from its registration records. If the voter notifies the county
board of elections of his objection to the removal within 30 days of the notice, the chairman of the board of elections shall enter a challenge under G.S. 163-85(c)(5), and the notice the county board received pursuant
to this subsection shall be prima facie evidence for the preliminary hearing that the registrant was convicted of a felony.

Change of Address. — A county board of elections shall conduct a systematic program to remove from its list of registered voters those who have moved out of the county, and to update the registration records of persons who have moved within the county.
The county board shall remove a person from its list if the registrant:

Gives confirmation in writing of a change of address for voting purposes out of the county. “Confirmation in writing” for purposes of this subdivision shall include:

A report to the county board from the Department of Transportation or from a voter registration agency listed in

G.S. 163-82.20

that the voter has reported a change of address for voting purposes outside the county;

A notice of cancellation received under

G.S. 163-82.9

; or

A notice of cancellation received from an election jurisdiction outside the State.

Fails to respond to a confirmation mailing sent by the county board in accordance with this subdivision and does not vote or appear to vote in an election beginning on the date of the notice and ending on the day after the date of the second general election
for the United States House of Representatives that occurs after the date of the notice. A county board sends a confirmation notice in accordance with this subdivision if the notice:

Is a postage prepaid and preaddressed return card, sent by forwardable mail, on which the registrant may state current address;

Contains or is accompanied by a notice to the effect that if the registrant did not change residence but remained in the county, the registrant should return the card not later than the deadline for registration by mail in G.S. 163-82.6(d)(1); and

Contains or is accompanied by information as to how the registrant may continue to be eligible to vote if the registrant has moved outside the county. A county board shall send a confirmation mailing in accordance with this subdivision to every registrant
after every congressional election if the county board has not confirmed the registrant’s address by another means.

Any registrant who is removed from the list of registered voters pursuant to this subsection shall be reinstated if the voter appears to vote and gives oral or written affirmation that the voter has not moved out of the county but has maintained residence
continuously within the county. That person shall be allowed to vote as provided in G.S. 163-82.15(f).

Cooperation on List Maintenance Efforts. — The State Board of Elections has the authority to perform list maintenance under this section with the same authority as a county board.

Annual Report on List Maintenance Efforts. — County board of elections shall submit to the State Board of Elections an annual report, on or before September 1 of each year, of its list maintenance under this section. The State Board of Elections shall
compile annual reports received from the county board of elections and submit the reports to the Joint Legislative Elections Oversight Committee on or before October 1 of each year.

History.
1953, c. 843; 1955, c. 800; 1963, c. 303, s. 1; 1965, c. 1116, s. 1; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, ss. 25, 28; c. 1223, s. 4; 1975, c. 395; 1977, c. 265, s. 3; 1981, c. 39, s. 1; c. 87, s. 1; c. 308, s. 1; 1983, c. 411,
ss. 1, 2; 1985, c. 211, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 691, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.117; 1999-453, s. 7(a), (b); 2001-319, ss. 8(a), 11; 2005-428, s. 14; 2007-391, ss. 18, 32; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2013-381,
ss. 18.1, 39.1(b); 2014-111, s. 16; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-112, s. 4; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.15.
Change of address within the county.

Registrant’s Duty to Report. — No registered voter shall be required to re-register upon moving from one precinct to another within the same county. Instead, a registrant shall notify the county board of the change of address by the close of registration
for an election as set out in

G.S. 163-82.6

(d). In addition to any other method allowed by

G.S. 163-82.6

, the form may be submitted by electronic facsimile, under the same deadlines as if it had been submitted in person. The registrant shall make the notification by means of a voter registration form as described in

G.S. 163-82.3

, or by another written notice, signed by the registrant, that includes the registrant’s full name, former residence address, new residence address, and the registrant’s attestation that the registrant moved at least
30 days before the next primary or election from the old to the new address.

Verification of New Address by Mail. — When a county board of elections receives a notice that a registrant in that county has changed residence within the same county, the county board shall send a notice, by nonforwardable mail, to the registrant at
the new address. The notice shall inform the registrant of any new precinct and voting place that will result from the change of address, and it shall state whether the registrant shall vote at the new voting place during the upcoming
election or at a later election. If the Postal Service returns the county board’s notice to the registrant as undeliverable, the county board shall either:

Send a second notice by nonforwardable mail to the new address and, if it is returned as undeliverable, send to the registrant’s old address a confirmation notice as described in

G.S. 163-82.14(d)

(2); or

Send to the registrant’s old address a confirmation notice as described in

G.S. 163-82.14(d)

(2) without first sending a second nonforwardable notice to the new address. In either case, if the registrant does not respond to the confirmation notice as described in G.S. 163-82.14(d)(2), then the
county board shall proceed with the removal of the registrant from the list of voters in accordance with G.S. 163-82.14(d).

Board’s Duty to Make Change. — If the county board confirms the registrant’s new address in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, the county board shall as soon as practical change the record to reflect the new address.

Unreported Move Within the Same Precinct. — A registrant who has moved from one address to another within the same precinct shall, notwithstanding failure to notify the county board of the change of address before an election, be permitted to vote at
the voting place of that precinct upon oral or written affirmation by the registrant of the change of address before a precinct official at that voting place.

Unreported Move to Another Precinct Within the County. — If a registrant has moved from an address in one precinct to an address in another precinct within the same county more than 30 days before an election and has failed to notify the county board
of the change of address before the close of registration for that election, the county board shall permit that person to vote in that election. The county board shall permit the registrant described in this subsection to vote
at the registrant’s new precinct, upon the registrant’s written affirmation of the new address, or, if the registrant prefers, at a central location in the county to be chosen by the county board. If the registrant appears at the
old precinct, the precinct officials there shall (i) send the registrant to the new precinct or, (ii) if the registrant prefers, to the central location, according to rules which shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections,
or (iii) permit the voter to vote a provisional ballot and shall count the individual’s provisional official ballot for all ballot items on which it determines that the individual was eligible under State or federal law to vote.
At the new precinct, the registrant shall be processed by a precinct transfer assistant, according to rules which shall be prescribed by the State Board of Elections.

When Registrant Disputes Registration Records. — If the registration records indicate that the registrant has moved outside the precinct, but the registrant denies having moved from the address within the precinct previously shown on the records, the
registrant shall be permitted to vote at the voting place for the precinct where the registrant claims to reside, if the registrant gives oral or written affirmation before a precinct official at that voting place.

Precinct Transfer Assistants. — The county board of elections shall either designate a board employee or appoint other persons to serve as precinct transfer assistants to receive the election-day transfers of the voters described in subsection (e) of
this section. In addition, board members and employees may perform the duties of precinct transfer assistants. The State Board of Elections shall promulgate uniform rules to carry out the provisions of this section, and shall define
in those rules the duties of the precinct transfer assistant.

History.
1979, c. 135, s. 2; 1983, c. 392, s. 2; 1984, Ex. Sess., c. 3, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 549, s. 1; 1989, c. 427; 1991, c. 12, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1032, s. 3; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 2001-314, s. 1;
2005-2, s. 3; 2006-262, s. 2; 2014-111, s. 12(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146 s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.15A.
Administrative change of registration when county line is adjusted.

When a boundary between counties is established by legislation or under

G.S. 153A-18

, the Executive Director shall direct the county boards of elections involved to administratively change the voter registration of any voter whose county of residence is altered by the establishment of the boundary. The
voter shall not be required to submit a new application to register, and the provisions of

G.S. 163-57

shall apply to the determination of residency. The Executive Director shall prescribe a method of notifying the voter of the change of county registration, the correct precinct, and other relevant information.

History.
2005-428, s. 3(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.16.
Change of name.

Registrant’s Duty to Report. — If the name of a registrant is changed in accordance with

G.S. 48-1-104

,

G.S. 50-12

, or Chapter 101 of the General Statutes, or if a married registrant assumes the last name of the registrant’s spouse, the registrant shall not be required to re-register, but shall report the change of name to the
county board not later than the last day for applying to register to vote for an election in

G.S. 163-82.6

. The registrant shall report the change on a form described in

G.S. 163-82.3

or on a voter registration card described in

G.S. 163-82.8

or in another written statement that is signed, contains the registrant’s full names, old and new, and the registrant’s current residence address.

Verification of New Name by Mail. — When a county board of elections receives a notice of name change from a registrant in that county, the county board shall send a notice, by nonforwardable mail, to the registrant’s residence address. The notice shall
state that the registrant’s records will be changed to reflect the new name if the registrant does not respond that the name change is incorrect. If the Postal Service returns the county board’s notice to the registrant as undeliverable,
the county board shall send to the registrant’s residence address a confirmation notice as described in

G.S. 163-82.14(d)

(2).If the registrant does not respond to the confirmation notice as described in

G.S. 163-82.14(d)

(2), then the county board shall proceed with the removal of the registrant from the list of voters in accordance with G.S. 163-82.14(d).

Board’s Duty to Make Change. — If the county board confirms the registrant’s address in accordance with subsection (b) of this section and the registrant does not deny making the application for the name change, the county board shall as soon as practical
change the record of the registrant’s name to conform to that stated in the application.

Unreported Name Change. — A registrant who has not reported a name change in accordance with subsection (a) of this section shall be permitted to vote if the registrant reports the name change to the chief judge at the voting place, or to the county
board along with the voter’s application for an absentee ballot.

History.
1979, c. 480; 1981, c. 33, s. 3; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 991, s. 3; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1032, s. 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 1995, c. 457, s. 9; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-82.17.
Change of party affiliation.

Registrant’s Duty to Report. — Any registrant who desires to have the record of his party affiliation or unaffiliated status changed on the registration list shall, no later than the last day for making application to register under

G.S. 163-82.6

before the election, indicate the change on an application form as described in

G.S. 163-82.3

or on a voter registration card described in

G.S. 163-82.8

. No registrant shall be permitted to change party affiliation or unaffiliated status for a primary, second primary, or special or general election after the deadline for registration applications for that election
as set out in

G.S. 163-82.6

.

Verification of Affiliation Change by Mail. — When a county board of elections receives a notice of change of party affiliation or unaffiliated status from a registrant in that county, the county board shall send a notice, by nonforwardable mail, to
the registrant’s residence address. The notice shall state that the registrant’s records will be changed to reflect the change of status if the registrant does not respond by stating that he does not desire a change in status.
The notice shall also inform the registrant of the time that the change of affiliation status will occur, and shall explain the provisions of subsection (d) of this section. If the Postal Service returns the county board’s notice
to the registrant as undeliverable, the county board shall send to the registrant’s residence address a confirmation notice as described in

G.S. 163-82.14(d)

(2). If the registrant does not respond to the confirmation notice as described in

G.S. 163-82.14(d)

(2), then the county board shall proceed with the removal of the registrant from the list of voters in accordance with G.S. 163-82.14(d).

Board’s Duty to Make Change. — If the county board confirms the registrant’s address in accordance with subsection (b) of this section and the registrant does not deny making the application to change affiliated or unaffiliated status, the county board
of elections shall as soon as practical change the record of the registrant’s party affiliation, or unaffiliated status, to conform to that stated in the application. Thereafter the voter shall be considered registered and qualified
to vote in accordance with the change, except as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

Deadline to Change Status Before Primary. — If a registrant applies to change party affiliation or unaffiliated status later than the last day for applying to register under

G.S. 163-82.6

before a primary, the registrant shall not be entitled to vote in the primary of a party in which the registrant’s status on that last day did not entitle the registrant to vote.

Authority of County Board or Director to Make Correction. — If at any time the chairman or director of elections of the county board of elections is satisfied that an error has been made in designating the party affiliation of any voter on the registration
records, then the chairman or director of elections of the county board of elections shall make the necessary correction after receiving from the voter a sworn statement as to the error and the correct status.

History.
1939, c. 263, s. 6; 1949, c. 916, ss. 4, 8; 1953, c. 843; 1955, c. 800; c. 871, s. 3; 1957, c. 784, s. 5; 1963, c. 303, s. 1; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 793, ss. 30, 31; c. 1223, s. 5; 1975, c. 234, s. 2; 1977, c. 130,
s. 1; c. 626, s. 1; 1981, c. 33, s. 4; c. 219, s. 4; 1983, c. 576, s. 4; 1987, c. 408, ss. 1, 6; 1989, c. 635, s. 2; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1032, s. 4; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 2; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146,
s. 3.1(a), (b).